Utah statutes.
73-5a-603.   Emergency power of state engineer.

(1)  The state engineer may intervene during dam emergencies if the owner of the dam cannot be found or is unwilling to take appropriate action.  Intervention may occur only when, in the judgment of the state engineer, the condition of any dam is so dangerous to the safety of life or property as to not permit time for issuance and enforcement of any order.

(2)  Emergency actions may include:

(a)  alerting appropriate public safety entities of the problem;

(b)  draining the reservoir;

(c)  hiring personnel or leasing equipment to undertake emergency operations; or

(d)  taking other steps considered necessary to safeguard life and property.

(3)  Any expenses incurred in undertaking emergency operations shall be reimbursed by the owner of the dam.

